Hawaii statutes.
§40-4 Publication of statements. The
comptroller shall prepare and submit to the governor, immediately following the
close of each fiscal year, a statement of income and expenditure by funds,
showing the principal sources of revenue, the function or purpose for which
expenditures were made, together with a consolidated statement showing similar
information for all funds; also a statement showing the balance in each fund at
the beginning of the fiscal year, plus the receipts, minus the disbursements,
and the balance on hand at the close of the fiscal year after deducting
outstanding warrants and vouchers. The comptroller may request all agencies,
the judiciary, the University of Hawaii until June 30, 2016, the department of
education, and the legislature to provide such information as may be required
for the preparation of statements. [L 1898, c 39, §19; RL 1925, §1431; am L
1927, c 219, §1; RL 1935, §556; RL 1945, §1558; RL 1955, §34-7; am L 1957, c
152, §1; HRS §40-4; am L 1974, c 159, §6; am L 1986, c 321, §§6, 12; am L 1987,
c 283, §69; am L 1989, c 371, §7; am L 1991, c 163, §3; am L 1993, c 314, §2;
am L Sp 1993, c 8, §22; am L 1996, c 231, §2; am L 1997, c 180, §1; am L 1998,
c 115, §24; am L 2004, c 58, §§4, 14; am L 2005, c 22, §50 and c 137, §1; am L
2006, c 161, §§3, 7 and c 306, §1; am L Sp 2009, c 5, §12; am L 2010, c 102, §5,
and c 124, §7 as superseded by c 124, §11; am L 2015, c 44, §§3, 7, 8]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next